Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections 54-1901 to 54-1915.02 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law.

Laws 1969, c. 449, § 1, p. 1502;

Laws 2021, LB324, § 1.